North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 36. Entitlement of Indigent Persons Generally.

§ 7A-450.
Indigency; definition; entitlement; determination; change of status.

An indigent person is a person who is financially unable to secure legal representation and to provide all other necessary expenses of representation in an action or proceeding enumerated in this Subchapter. An interpreter is a necessary expense as defined in Chapter 8B of the General Statutes for a deaf person who is entitled to counsel under this subsection.

Whenever a person, under the standards and procedures set out in this Subchapter, is determined to be an indigent person entitled to counsel, it is the responsibility of the State to provide him with counsel and the other necessary expenses of representation. The professional relationship of counsel so provided to the indigent person he represents is the same as if counsel had been privately retained by the indigent person.

(b1)

An indigent person indicted for murder may not be tried where the State is seeking the death penalty without an assistant counsel being appointed in a timely manner. If the indigent person is represented by the public defender’s office, the requirement of an assistant counsel may be satisfied by the assignment to the case of an additional attorney from the public defender’s staff.

The question of indigency may be determined or redetermined by the court at any stage of the action or proceeding at which an indigent is entitled to representation.

If, at any stage in the action or proceeding, a person previously determined to be indigent becomes financially able to secure legal representation and provide other necessary expenses of representation, he must inform the counsel appointed by the court to represent him of that fact. In such a case, that information is not included in the attorney client privilege, and counsel must promptly inform the court of that information.

History.

1969, c. 1013, s. 1; 1981, c. 409, s. 2; c. 937, s. 3; 1985, c. 698, s. 22(a); 2000-144, s. 5.

Cross References.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B,

G.S. 7A-498

et seq.

As to representation by counsel of person affected by limited freedom of movement or access imposed due to terrorist incident, see G.S. 130A-475(b).

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on assigned counsel and public defender systems, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 705 (1971).

For note on providing indigent criminal defendants state-paid investigators, see 13 Wake Forest L. Rev. 655 (1977).

For note on an indigent’s constitutional right to a state-paid expert, see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1031 (1980).

For survey of 1980 law on criminal procedure, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1140 (1981).

For note discussing failure to communicate and effective assistance of counsel in light of State v. Hutchins,

303 N.C. 321

, 279 S.E.2d 788 (1981), see 13 N.C. Cent. L.J. 101 (1981).

For survey of 1981 law on criminal procedure, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1302 (1982).

For note discussing defendant’s due process right to a psychiatric expert, see 8 Campbell L. Rev. 323 (1986).

For note, “North Carolina County Jail Inmates’ Right of Access to Courts,” see 66 N.C.L. Rev. 583 (1988).

For note, “The Right to Appointment of Counsel for the Indigent Civil Contemnor Facing Incarceration for Failure to Pay Child Support — McBride v. McBride,” 16 Campbell L. Rev. 127 (1994).

For article, “Pay to Play?
Campaign Finance and the Incentive Gap in the Sixth Amendment’s Right to Counsel,” see 70 Duke L.J. 775 (2021).

§ 7A-450.1.
Responsibility for payment by certain fiduciaries.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that, whenever possible, if an attorney or guardian ad litem is appointed pursuant to

G.S. 7A-451

for a person who is less than 18 years old or who is at least 18 years old but remains dependent on and domiciled with a parent or guardian, the parent, guardian, or any trustee in possession of funds or property for the benefit of the person, shall reimburse the State for the attorney or guardian ad litem fees, pursuant to the procedures established in

G.S. 7A-450.2

and

G.S. 7A-450.3

. This section shall not apply in any case in which the person for whom an attorney or guardian ad litem is appointed prevails.

History.

1983, c. 726, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1030, s. 2.

§ 7A-450.2.
Determination of fiduciaries at indigency determination; summons; service of process.

At the same time as a person who is less than 18 years old or who is at least 18 years old but remains dependent on and domiciled with a parent or guardian is determined to be indigent, and has an attorney or guardian ad litem appointed pursuant to

G.S. 7A-451

, the court shall determine the identity and address of the parent, guardian or any trustee in possession of funds or property for the benefit of the person. The court shall issue a summons to the parent, guardian or trustee to be present at the dispositional hearing or the sentencing hearing or other appropriate hearing and to be a party to these hearings for the purpose of being determined responsible for reimbursing the State for the person’s attorney or guardian ad litem fees, or to show cause why he should not be held responsible.

Both the issuance of the summons and the service of process shall be pursuant to

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 4.

History.

1983, c. 726, s. 1.

§ 7A-450.3.
Determination of responsibility at hearing.

At the dispositional, sentencing or other hearing of the person who is less than 18 years old or who is at least 18 years old but remains dependent on and domiciled with a parent or guardian, the court shall make a determination whether the parent, guardian or trustee should be held responsible for reimbursing the State for the person’s attorney or guardian ad litem fees. This determination shall include the financial situation of the parent, guardian or trustee, the relationship of responsibility the parent, guardian or trustee bears to the person and any showings by the parent, guardian or trustee that the person is emancipated or not dependent. The test of the party’s financial ability to pay is the test applied to appointment of an attorney in cases of indigency. Any provision of any deed, trust or other writing, which, if enforced, would defeat the intent or purpose of this section is contrary to the public policy of this State and is void insofar as it may apply to prohibit reimbursement to the State.

If the court determines that the parent, guardian or trustee is responsible for reimbursing the State for the attorney or guardian ad litem fees, the court shall so order. If the party does not comply with the order at the time of disposition, the court shall file a judgment against him for the amount due the State.

History.

1983, c. 726, s. 1; 2005-254, s. 3.

§ 7A-450.4.
Exemptions.

General Statutes 7A-450.1, 7A-450.2 and 7A-450.3 do not authorize the court to require the Department of Health and Human Services or any county Department of Social Services to reimburse the State for fees.

History.

1983, c. 726, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).

§ 7A-451.
Scope of entitlement. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

An indigent person is entitled to services of counsel in the following actions and proceedings:

Any case in which imprisonment, or a fine of five hundred dollars ($500.00), or more, is likely to be adjudged.

A hearing on a petition for a writ of habeas corpus under Chapter 17 of the General Statutes.

A motion for appropriate relief under Chapter 15A of the General Statutes if appointment of counsel is authorized by Chapter 15A of the General Statutes and the defendant has been convicted of a felony, has been fined five hundred dollars ($500.00) or more, or has been sentenced to a term of imprisonment.

A hearing for revocation of probation.

A hearing in which extradition to another state is sought.

A proceeding for an inpatient involuntary commitment to a facility under Part 7 of Article 5 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes, or a proceeding for commitment under Part 8 of Article 5 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes.

In any case of execution against the person under Chapter 1, Article 28 of the General Statutes, and in any civil arrest and bail proceeding under Chapter 1, Article 34, of the General Statutes.

In the case of a juvenile, a hearing as a result of which commitment to an institution or transfer to the superior court for trial on a felony charge is possible.

A hearing for revocation of parole at which the right to counsel is provided in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 148, Article 4, of the General Statutes.

Repealed by Session Laws 2003, c. 13, s. 2(a), effective April 17, 2003, and applicable to all petitions for sterilization pending and orders authorizing sterilization that have not been executed as of April 17, 2003.

A proceeding for the provision of protective services according to Chapter 108A, Article 6 of the General Statutes.

In the case of a juvenile alleged to be abused, neglected, or dependent under Subchapter I of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes.

A proceeding to find a person incompetent under Subchapter I of Chapter 35A, of the General Statutes.

A proceeding to terminate parental rights where a guardian ad litem is appointed pursuant to

G.S. 7B-1101

.

An action brought pursuant to Article 11 of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes to terminate an indigent person’s parental rights.

A proceeding involving consent for an abortion on an unemancipated minor pursuant to Article 1A, Part 2 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.

G.S. 7A-450.1

, 7A-450.2, and 7A-450.3 shall not apply to this proceeding.

A proceeding involving limitation on freedom of movement or access pursuant to

G.S. 130A-475

or

G.S. 130A-145

.

A proceeding involving placement into satellite monitoring under Part 5 of Article 27A of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes.

A proceeding involving a review of the sex offender registration requirement as provided in

G.S. 14-208.12

B.

In each of the actions and proceedings enumerated in subsection (a) of this section, entitlement to the services of counsel begins as soon as feasible after the indigent is taken into custody or service is made upon him of the charge, petition, notice or other initiating process. Entitlement continues through any critical stage of the action or proceeding, including, if applicable:

An in-custody interrogation;

A pretrial identification procedure which occurs after formal charges have been preferred and at which the presence of the indigent is required;

A hearing for the reduction of bail, or to fix bail if bail has been earlier denied;

A probable cause hearing;

Trial and sentencing;

Review of any judgment or decree pursuant to

G.S. 7A-27

, 7A-30(1), 7A-30(2), and Subchapter XIV of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes;

In a capital case in which a defendant is under a sentence of death, subject to rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services, review of any judgment or decree rendered on direct appeal by the Supreme Court of North Carolina pursuant to the certiorari jurisdiction of the United States Supreme Court; and

In a noncapital case, subject to rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services, review of any judgment or decree rendered on direct appeal by a court of the North Carolina Appellate Division pursuant to the certiorari jurisdiction of the United States Supreme Court, when the judgment or decree:

Decides an important question of federal law in a way that conflicts with relevant decisions of the United States Supreme Court, a federal Court of Appeals, or the court of last resort of another state;

Decides an important question of federal law that has not been, but should be, settled by the United States Supreme Court; or

Decides a question of federal law in the indigent’s favor and the judgment or decree is challenged by opposing counsel through an attempt to invoke the certiorari jurisdiction of the United States Supreme Court.

In any capital case, an indigent defendant who is under a sentence of death and desires counsel may apply to the Office of Indigent Defense Services for the appointment of counsel to represent the defendant in preparing, filing, and litigating a motion for appropriate relief. The application for the appointment of such postconviction counsel may be made prior to completion of review on direct appeal and shall be made no later than 10 days from the latest of the following:

The mandate has been issued by the Supreme Court of North Carolina on direct appeal pursuant to N.C.R. App. P. 32(b) and the time for filing a petition for writ of certiorari to the United States Supreme Court has expired without a petition being filed;

The United States Supreme Court denied a timely petition for writ of certiorari of the decision on direct appeal by the Supreme Court of North Carolina; or

The United States Supreme Court granted the defendant’s or the State’s timely petition for writ of certiorari of the decision on direct appeal by the Supreme Court of North Carolina, but subsequently left the defendant’s death sentence undisturbed.

(c1)

Upon application, supported by the defendant’s affidavit, the Office of Indigent Defense Services shall determine whether the defendant was previously adjudicated indigent for purposes of trial or direct appeal. If the defendant was previously adjudicated indigent, the defendant shall be presumed indigent for purposes of this subsection, and the Office of Indigent Defense Services shall appoint two counsel to represent the defendant. If the defendant was not previously adjudicated indigent, the Office of Indigent Defense Services shall request that the superior court in the district where the defendant was indicted determine whether the defendant is indigent. If the court finds that the defendant is indigent, the Office of Indigent Defense Services shall then appoint two counsel to represent the defendant.

(c2)

The defendant does not have a right to be present at the time of appointment of counsel, and the appointment need not be made in open court.

The appointment of counsel as provided in subsection (c) of this section and the procedure for compensation shall comply with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

No counsel appointed pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall have previously represented the defendant at trial or on direct appeal in the case for which the appointment is made unless the defendant expressly requests continued representation and understandingly waives future allegations of ineffective assistance of counsel.

(e1)

When the Supreme Court of North Carolina files an opinion affirming or reversing the judgment of the trial court in a case in which the defendant was sentenced to death, or files an opinion or decision with regard to such a defendant’s postconviction petition for relief from a sentence of death, or when any federal court files or issues an opinion or decision in such circumstances, the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall, on the day the opinion or decision is filed or issued, permit counsel for the defendant to visit the defendant at the institution at which the defendant is confined. The visit shall be permitted during regular business hours for not less than one hour, unless a visit outside regular business hours is agreed to by both the institution’s administrator and counsel for the defendant. This section shall not be construed to abridge the adequate and reasonable opportunity for attorneys to consult with clients sentenced to death generally and shall not be construed to mandate an attorney visit during an emergency at the institution at which a defendant is confined.

A guardian ad litem shall be appointed to represent the best interest of an underage party seeking judicial authorization to marry pursuant to

G.S. 51-2

A. The appointment and duties of the guardian ad litem shall be governed by

G.S. 51-2

A. The procedure for compensation of the guardian ad litem shall comply with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

History.

1969, c. 1013, s. 1; 1973, c. 151, ss. 1, 3; c. 616; c. 726, s. 4; c. 1116, s. 1; c. 1125; c. 1320; c. 1378, s. 2; 1977, c. 711, ss. 7, 8; c. 725, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1206, s. 3; 1981, c. 966, s. 4; 1983, c. 638, s. 23; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 509, s. 1; c. 589, s. 3; 1987, c. 550, s. 16; 1995, c. 462, s. 3; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 719, s. 7; 1998-202, s. 13(a); 2000-144, s. 6; 2001-62, s. 14; 2002-179, s. 16; 2003-13, s. 2(a); 2005-250, s. 2; 2007-323, s. 14.19(a); 2009-91, s. 1; 2009-387, ss. 3, 5; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-176, s. 1(c); 2017-186, s. 2(f); 2020-83, s. 11.5(b).

Cross References.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B,

G.S. 7A-498

et seq.

§ 7A-451.
Scope of entitlement. [Effective January 1, 2023]

An indigent person is entitled to services of counsel in the following actions and proceedings:

Any case in which imprisonment, or a fine of five hundred dollars ($500.00), or more, is likely to be adjudged.

A hearing on a petition for a writ of habeas corpus under Chapter 17 of the General Statutes.

A motion for appropriate relief under Chapter 15A of the General Statutes if appointment of counsel is authorized by Chapter 15A of the General Statutes and the defendant has been convicted of a felony, has been fined five hundred dollars ($500.00) or more, or has been sentenced to a term of imprisonment.

A hearing for revocation of probation.

A hearing in which extradition to another state is sought.

A proceeding for an inpatient involuntary commitment to a facility under Part 7 of Article 5 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes, or a proceeding for commitment under Part 8 of Article 5 of Chapter 122C of the General Statutes.

In any case of execution against the person under Chapter 1, Article 28 of the General Statutes, and in any civil arrest and bail proceeding under Chapter 1, Article 34, of the General Statutes.

In the case of a juvenile, a hearing as a result of which commitment to an institution or transfer to the superior court for trial on a felony charge is possible.

A hearing for revocation of parole at which the right to counsel is provided in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 148, Article 4, of the General Statutes.

Repealed by Session Laws 2003, c. 13, s. 2(a), effective April 17, 2003, and applicable to all petitions for sterilization pending and orders authorizing sterilization that have not been executed as of April 17, 2003.

A proceeding for the provision of protective services according to Chapter 108A, Article 6 of the General Statutes.

In the case of a juvenile alleged to be abused, neglected, or dependent under Subchapter I of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes.

A proceeding to find a person incompetent under Subchapter I of Chapter 35A, of the General Statutes.

A proceeding to terminate parental rights where a guardian ad litem is appointed pursuant to

G.S. 7B-1101

.

An action brought pursuant to Article 11 of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes to terminate an indigent person’s parental rights.

A proceeding involving consent for an abortion on an unemancipated minor pursuant to Article 1A, Part 2 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.

G.S. 7A-450.1

, 7A-450.2, and 7A-450.3 shall not apply to this proceeding.

A proceeding involving limitation on freedom of movement or access pursuant to

G.S. 130A-475

or

G.S. 130A-145

.

A proceeding involving placement into satellite monitoring under Part 5 of Article 27A of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes.

A proceeding involving a review of the sex offender registration requirement as provided in

G.S. 14-208.12

B.

In each of the actions and proceedings enumerated in subsection (a) of this section, entitlement to the services of counsel begins as soon as feasible after the indigent is taken into custody or service is made upon him of the charge, petition, notice or other initiating process. Entitlement continues through any critical stage of the action or proceeding, including, if applicable:

An in-custody interrogation;

A pretrial identification procedure which occurs after formal charges have been preferred and at which the presence of the indigent is required;

A hearing for the reduction of bail, or to fix bail if bail has been earlier denied;

A probable cause hearing;

Trial and sentencing;

Review of any judgment or decree pursuant to

G.S. 7A-27

, 7A-30(1), 7A-30(2), and Subchapter XIV of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes;

In a capital case in which a defendant is under a sentence of death, subject to rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services, review of any judgment or decree rendered on direct appeal by the Supreme Court of North Carolina pursuant to the certiorari jurisdiction of the United States Supreme Court; and

In a noncapital case, subject to rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services, review of any judgment or decree rendered on direct appeal by a court of the North Carolina Appellate Division pursuant to the certiorari jurisdiction of the United States Supreme Court, when the judgment or decree:

Decides an important question of federal law in a way that conflicts with relevant decisions of the United States Supreme Court, a federal Court of Appeals, or the court of last resort of another state;

Decides an important question of federal law that has not been, but should be, settled by the United States Supreme Court; or

Decides a question of federal law in the indigent’s favor and the judgment or decree is challenged by opposing counsel through an attempt to invoke the certiorari jurisdiction of the United States Supreme Court.

In any capital case, an indigent defendant who is under a sentence of death and desires counsel may apply to the Office of Indigent Defense Services for the appointment of counsel to represent the defendant in preparing, filing, and litigating a motion for appropriate relief. The application for the appointment of such postconviction counsel may be made prior to completion of review on direct appeal and shall be made no later than 10 days from the latest of the following:

The mandate has been issued by the Supreme Court of North Carolina on direct appeal pursuant to N.C.R. App. P. 32(b) and the time for filing a petition for writ of certiorari to the United States Supreme Court has expired without a petition being filed;

The United States Supreme Court denied a timely petition for writ of certiorari of the decision on direct appeal by the Supreme Court of North Carolina; or

The United States Supreme Court granted the defendant’s or the State’s timely petition for writ of certiorari of the decision on direct appeal by the Supreme Court of North Carolina, but subsequently left the defendant’s death sentence undisturbed.

(c1)

Upon application, supported by the defendant’s affidavit, the Office of Indigent Defense Services shall determine whether the defendant was previously adjudicated indigent for purposes of trial or direct appeal. If the defendant was previously adjudicated indigent, the defendant shall be presumed indigent for purposes of this subsection, and the Office of Indigent Defense Services shall appoint two counsel to represent the defendant. If the defendant was not previously adjudicated indigent, the Office of Indigent Defense Services shall request that the superior court in the district where the defendant was indicted determine whether the defendant is indigent. If the court finds that the defendant is indigent, the Office of Indigent Defense Services shall then appoint two counsel to represent the defendant.

(c2)

The defendant does not have a right to be present at the time of appointment of counsel, and the appointment need not be made in open court.

The appointment of counsel as provided in subsection (c) of this section and the procedure for compensation shall comply with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

No counsel appointed pursuant to subsection (c) of this section shall have previously represented the defendant at trial or on direct appeal in the case for which the appointment is made unless the defendant expressly requests continued representation and understandingly waives future allegations of ineffective assistance of counsel.

(e1)

When the Supreme Court of North Carolina files an opinion affirming or reversing the judgment of the trial court in a case in which the defendant was sentenced to death, or files an opinion or decision with regard to such a defendant’s postconviction petition for relief from a sentence of death, or when any federal court files or issues an opinion or decision in such circumstances, the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall, on the day the opinion or decision is filed or issued, permit counsel for the defendant to visit the defendant at the institution at which the defendant is confined. The visit shall be permitted during regular business hours for not less than one hour, unless a visit outside regular business hours is agreed to by both the institution’s administrator and counsel for the defendant. This section shall not be construed to abridge the adequate and reasonable opportunity for attorneys to consult with clients sentenced to death generally and shall not be construed to mandate an attorney visit during an emergency at the institution at which a defendant is confined.

A guardian ad litem shall be appointed to represent the best interest of an underage party seeking judicial authorization to marry pursuant to

G.S. 51-2

A. The appointment and duties of the guardian ad litem shall be governed by

G.S. 51-2

A. The procedure for compensation of the guardian ad litem shall comply with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

History.

1969, c. 1013, s. 1; 1973, c. 151, ss. 1, 3; c. 616; c. 726, s. 4; c. 1116, s. 1; c. 1125; c. 1320; c. 1378, s. 2; 1977, c. 711, ss. 7, 8; c. 725, s. 2; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1206, s. 3; 1981, c. 966, s. 4; 1983, c. 638, s. 23; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 509, s. 1; c. 589, s. 3; 1987, c. 550, s. 16; 1995, c. 462, s. 3; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 719, s. 7; 1998-202, s. 13(a); 2000-144, s. 6; 2001-62, s. 14; 2002-179, s. 16; 2003-13, s. 2(a); 2005-250, s. 2; 2007-323, s. 14.19(a); 2009-91, s. 1; 2009-387, ss. 3, 5; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-176, s. 1(c); 2017-186, s. 2(f); 2020-83, s. 11.5(b); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Section Set Out Twice.

This section is printed in the supplement to correct an error in the main volume.

Cross References.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B,

G.S. 7A-498

et seq.

§ 7A-451.1.
Counsel fees for outpatient involuntary commitment proceedings.

The State shall pay counsel fees for persons appointed pursuant to G.S. 122C-267(d).

History.

1983, c. 638, s. 24; c. 864, s. 4; 1985, c. 589, s. 4; 1991, c. 761, s. 3.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1983 constitutional law, see 62 N.C.L. Rev. 1149 (1984).

§ 7A-452.
Source of counsel; fees; appellate records.

Upon the court’s determination that a person is indigent and entitled to counsel under this Article, counsel shall be appointed in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services. In noncapital cases, the court shall assign counsel pursuant to rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services. In capital cases, the Office of Indigent Defense Services or designee of the Office of Indigent Defense Services shall assign counsel; at least one member of each capital defense team, where practicable, shall be a member of the bar in that division. In the courts of those counties which have a public defender, however, the public defender may tentatively assign himself or an assistant public defender to represent an indigent person, subject to subsequent determination of entitlement to counsel by the court and approval by the court in noncapital cases and by the Office of Indigent Defense Services in capital cases.

Fees of assigned counsel and salaries and other operating expenses of the offices of the public defenders shall be borne by the State.

The clerk of superior court is authorized to make a determination of indigency and entitlement to counsel, as authorized by this Article. The word “court,” as it is used in this Article and in any rules pursuant to this Article, includes the clerk of superior court.

A judge of superior or district court having authority to determine entitlement to counsel in a particular case may give directions to the clerk with regard to the determination of entitlement to counsel in that case; may, if he finds it appropriate, change or modify the determination made by the clerk; and may set aside a finding of waiver of counsel made by the clerk.

Unless a public defender or assistant public defender is appointed to serve, standby counsel appointed under

G.S. 15A-1243

shall receive reasonable compensation to be paid by the State.

In cases in which an indigent person has entered notice of appeal and appellate counsel has been appointed by the Office of Indigent Defense Services, the clerk of superior court shall make a copy of the complete trial division file in the case, make a copy of documentary exhibits upon request, and furnish those files and any requested documentary exhibits to the appointed attorney.

History.

1969, c. 1013, s. 1; 1971, c. 377, s. 32; 1973, c. 1286, s. 8; 1977, c. 711, s. 9; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 29; 2000-144, s. 7; 2005-148, s. 1.

Cross References.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B,

G.S. 7A-498

et seq.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “North Carolina County Jail Inmates’ Right of Access to Courts,” see 66 N.C.L. Rev. 583 (1988).

§ 7A-453.
Duty of custodian of a possibly indigent person; determination of indigency.

In counties designated by the Office of Indigent Defense Services, the authority having custody of a person who is without counsel for more than 48 hours after being taken into custody shall so inform the designee of the Office of Indigent Defense Services. The designee of the Office of Indigent Defense Services shall make a preliminary determination as to the person’s entitlement to his services, and proceed accordingly. The court shall make the final determination.

In counties that have not been designated by the Office of Indigent Defense Services, the authority having custody of a person who is without counsel for more than 48 hours after being taken into custody shall so inform the clerk of superior court.

In any county, if a defendant, upon being taken into custody, states that he is indigent and desires counsel, the authority having custody shall immediately inform the designee of the Office of Indigent Defense Services or the clerk of superior court, as the case may be, who shall take action as provided in this Article.

The duties imposed by this section upon authorities having custody of persons who may be indigent are in addition to the duties imposed upon arresting officers under G.S. 15-47.

History.

1969, c. 1013, s. 1; 1973, c. 1286, s. 8; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 30; 2000-144, s. 8.

Cross References.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B,

G.S. 7A-498

et seq.

§ 7A-454.
Supporting services.

Fees for the services of an expert witness or other witnesses, paid in accordance with

G.S. 7A-314

, including travel expenses, lodging, and other appearance expenses, for an indigent person and other necessary expenses of counsel shall be paid by the State in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services.

History.

1969, c. 1013, s. 1; 2000-144, s. 9; 2011-145, s. 31.23C(b); 2011-391, s. 64.

Cross References.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B,

G.S. 7A-498

et seq.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 31.23C(b), as added by Session Laws 2011-391, s. 64, effective July 1, 2011, inserted “or other witnesses, paid in accordance with

G.S. 7A-314

, including travel expenses, lodging, and other appearance expenses.”

Legal Periodicals.

For note on providing indigent criminal defendants state-paid investigators, see 13 Wake Forest L. Rev. 655 (1977).

For note on an indigent’s constitutional right to a state-paid expert, see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1031 (1980).

§ 7A-455.
Partial indigency; liens; acquittals.

If, in the opinion of the court, an indigent person is financially able to pay a portion, but not all, of the value of the legal services rendered for that person by assigned counsel, the public defender, or the appellate defender, and other necessary expenses of representation, the court shall order the partially indigent person to pay such portion to the clerk of superior court for transmission to the State treasury.

In all cases the court shall direct that a judgment be entered in the office of the clerk of superior court for the money value of services rendered by assigned counsel, the public defender, or the appellate defender, plus any sums allowed for other necessary expenses of representing the indigent person, including any fees and expenses that may have been allowed prior to final determination of the action to assigned counsel pursuant to

G.S. 7A-458

, which shall constitute a lien as prescribed by the general law of the State applicable to judgments. Any reimbursement to the State as provided in subsection (a) of this section or any funds collected by reason of such judgment shall be deposited in the State treasury and credited against the judgment. The value of services shall be determined in accordance with rules adopted by the Office of Indigent Defense Services. The money value of services rendered by the public defender and the appellate defender shall be based upon the factors normally involved in fixing the fees of private attorneys, such as the nature of the case, the time, effort, and responsibility involved, and the fee usually charged in similar cases. A district court judge shall direct entry of judgment for actions or proceedings finally determined in the district court and a superior court judge shall direct entry of judgment for actions or proceedings originating in, heard on appeal in, or appealed from the superior court. Even if the trial, appeal, hearing, or other proceeding is never held, preparation therefor is nevertheless compensable.

(b1)

In every case in which the State is entitled to a lien pursuant to this section, the public defender shall at the time of sentencing or other conclusion of the proceedings petition the court to enter judgment for the value of the legal services rendered by the public defender, and the appellate defender shall upon completion of the appeal petition or request the trial court to enter judgment for the value of the legal services rendered by the appellate defender.

No order for partial payment under subsection (a) of this section and no judgment under subsection (b) of this section shall be entered unless the indigent person is convicted. If the indigent person is convicted, the order or judgment shall become effective and the judgment shall be docketed and indexed pursuant to

G.S. 1-233

et seq., in the amount then owing, upon the later of (i) the date upon which the conviction becomes final if the indigent person is not ordered, as a condition of probation, to pay the State of North Carolina for the costs of his representation in the case or (ii) the date upon which the indigent person’s probation is terminated, is revoked, or expires if the indigent person is so ordered. No order for partial payment under subsection (a) of this section and no judgment under subsection (b) of this section shall be entered for the value of legal services rendered to perfect an appeal to the Appellate Division or in postconviction proceedings, if all of the matters that the person raised in the proceeding are vacated, reversed, or remanded for a new trial or resentencing.

In all cases in which the entry of a judgment is authorized under

G.S. 7A-450.1

through

G.S. 7A-450.4

or under this section, the attorney, guardian ad litem, public defender, or appellate defender who rendered the services or incurred the expenses for which the judgment is to be entered shall make reasonable efforts to obtain the social security number, if any, of each person against whom judgment is to be entered. This number, a certification that the person has no social security number, or a certification that the social security number cannot be obtained with reasonable efforts shall be included in each fee application submitted by an assigned attorney, guardian ad litem, public defender, or appellate defender, and no order for payment entered upon an application which does not include the required social security number or certification shall be valid to authorize payment to the applicant from the Indigent Persons’ Attorney Fee Fund. Each judgment docketed against any person under this section or under

G.S. 7A-450.3

shall include the social security number, if any, of the judgment debtor.

History.

1969, c. 1013, s. 1; 1983, c. 135, s. 2; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1109, s. 12; 1985, c. 474, s. 9; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 946, ss. 5, 6; 1991, c. 761, s. 4; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 116(a); 2000-144, s. 10; 2005-254, s. 1; 2013-41, s. 1.

Cross References.

For the Indigent Defense Services Act, see Chapter 7A, Subchapter IX, Article 39B,

G.S. 7A-498

et seq.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-41, s. 1, effective May 2, 2013, substituted “terminated, is revoked, or expires” for “terminated or revoked” near the end of the first sentence in subsection (c); and, in subsection (d), inserted “make reasonable efforts to” following “judgment is to be entered shall” in the first sentence, in the second sentence, substituted “a certification” for “or a certificate” following “This number” and inserted “or a certification that the social security number cannot be obtained with reasonable efforts.”